Georgia, session 2025_26, HB221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
6 SECTION 1.
7 Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended in Part
8 14 of Article 6 of Chapter 2, relating to other educational programs under the "Quality Basic
9 Education Act," by revising Code Section 20-2-315, relating to gender discrimination
10 prohibited, authorized separate gender teams, equal athletic opportunity, physical education
11 classes, employee designated to monitor compliance, grievance procedures, and reporting
12 requirements, as follows:
13 "20-2-315.
14 (a) No student shall, on the basis of gender, be excluded from participation in, be denied
15 the benefits of, be treated differently from another student, or otherwise be discriminated
H. B. 221
- 1 -

25 LC 49 2175
16 against in any interscholastic or intramural athletics offered by a local school system, and
17 no local school system shall provide any such athletics separately on such basis.
18 (b) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section, a local school
19 system may operate or sponsor separate teams for members of each gender where selection
20 for such teams is based upon competitive skill or the activity involved is a contact sport.
21 However, where a local school system operates or sponsors a team in a particular sport for
22 members of one gender but operates or sponsors no such team for members of the other
23 gender, and athletic opportunities for members of that gender in that particular sport have
24 previously been limited, members of the excluded gender must be allowed to try out for the
25 team offered unless the sport involved is a contact sport. Nothing in this subsection shall
26 be construed to limit the authority of a local school system to operate or sponsor a single
27 team for a contact sport that includes members of both genders. As used in this subsection,
28 the term 'contact sport' includes boxing, wrestling, rugby, ice hockey, football, basketball,
29 and any other sport the purpose or major activity of which involves bodily contact.
30 (c) A local school system which operates or sponsors interscholastic or intramural athletics
31 shall undertake all reasonable efforts to provide for equal athletic opportunity for members
32 of both genders by taking all steps reasonably necessary to ensure . In determining whether
33 equal opportunities are available the following factors shall be considered:
34 (1) Whether that the selection of sports and levels of competition effectively
35 accommodate the interests and abilities of members and teams of both genders and that
36 comparable and equivalent funds, facilities access, equipment, supplies, and other
37 resources are being provided for members and teams of both genders as demonstrated
38 by:;
39 (2)(1) The provision of equipment and supplies;
40 (2) The location of locker rooms and practice and competitive facilities;
41 (3) The scheduling Scheduling of games and practice time practices;
42 (4) Travel allowance allowances;
H. B. 221
- 2 -

25 LC 49 2175
43 (5) Opportunity Opportunities for students to receive coaching and academic tutoring;
44 (6) Assignment The assignment and compensation of coaches and academic tutors for
45 students, including, but not limited to, whether the compensation of coaches is
46 commensurate with time actually spent engaged in coaching, academic tutoring, or other
47 assigned duties;
48 (7) Provision of locker rooms and practice and competitive facilities;
49 (8) Provision The provision of medical and training facilities and services; and
50 (9)(8) Publicity.
51 Unequal aggregate expenditures for members of each gender or unequal expenditures for
52 male and female teams if a local school system operates or sponsors separate teams will
53 not constitute noncompliance with this subsection, but the failure to provide essential funds
54 comparable and equivalent funds, facilities access, equipment, supplies, and other
55 resources for the basic operations of teams for one gender may be considered in assessing
56 equality of opportunity for members of each gender shall constitute such noncompliance.
57 Nothing in Code Section 20-2-411 shall be construed to limit the authority of a local school
58 system to expend school tax funds as authorized by Article VIII, Section VI, Paragraph I(b)
59 of the Constitution in order to comply with the requirements of this Code section.
60 (d) A local school system may provide separate toilet, locker room, and shower facilities
61 on the basis of gender, but such facilities shall be comparable to such facilities provided
62 for students of the other gender.
63 (e) This Code section does not prohibit the grouping of students in physical education
64 classes by gender.
65 (f)(1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection, if a local school
66 system sponsors an athletic activity or sport at a particular school that is similar to a sport
67 for which an institution in the University System of Georgia offers an athletic
68 scholarship, it must sponsor the athletic activity or sport for which a scholarship is
69 offered at that school. This paragraph does not affect academic requirements for
H. B. 221
- 3 -

25 LC 49 2175
70 participation nor prevent the local school system from sponsoring activities in addition
71 to those for which scholarships are provided.
72 (2) Two athletic activities or sports that are similar may be offered simultaneously.
73 (3) If a local school system demonstrates by a bona fide survey of eligible students at the
74 school, which is approved by the Department of Education for compliance with generally
75 accepted opinion survey principles regarding neutral wording and other matters, that there
76 is insufficient interest among students at the school to field a team described in
77 paragraph (1) of this subsection, then the local school system shall not be required to
78 sponsor such athletic activity or sport at that school. The exemption provided for by this
79 paragraph shall be valid for 24 months following the date when the most recent bona fide
80 student survey demonstrating a lack of student interest was completed, unless a new bona
81 fide student survey is conducted within the 24 month period that demonstrates sufficient
82 interest to field a team. If such a new bona fide student survey demonstrates such
83 sufficient interest, then the local school system must comply with paragraph (1) of this
84 subsection during the local school system's next fiscal year and until such time as a new
85 bona fide student survey demonstrates insufficient interest to field a team described in
86 paragraph (1) of this subsection. A local school system shall conduct the bona fide
87 student survey described in this paragraph regarding interest in a team described in
88 paragraph (1) of this subsection upon the request of nine students at the school, but no
89 more frequently than once every 12 months.
90 (4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude the application of generally
91 applicable policies or rules regarding the cancellation of an athletic activity or sport due
92 to lack of student participation in scheduled practices or contests.
93 (g) Each local school system shall designate at least one employee to coordinate its efforts
94 to comply with and carry out its responsibilities under this Code section, including the
95 investigation of any complaint communicated to such local school system alleging its
96 noncompliance with this Code section. The employee designated under this subsection
H. B. 221
- 4 -

25 LC 49 2175
97 may be the same person required to be designated under 34 C.F.R. Section 106.8. The
98 local school system annually shall notify all its students of the name, office address, and
99 office telephone number of the employee or employees appointed pursuant to this
100 subsection. Such notification may be included in a student handbook code of conduct
101 distributed pursuant to Code Section 20-2-736.
102 (h) Each local school system shall adopt and publish grievance procedures providing for
103 prompt and equitable resolution of written student complaints, including complaints
104 brought by a parent or guardian on behalf of his or her minor child who is a student,
105 alleging any action which would be a violation of this Code section. Such procedures shall
106 require that:
107 (1) The employee designated under subsection (g) of this Code section shall render his
108 or her decision in writing no later than 30 days after receipt of the complaint, and such
109 decision shall set forth the essential facts and rationale for the decision;
110 (2) A copy of such decision shall be provided to the complainant within five days of the
111 date of the decision; and
112 (3) A complainant shall have a right to appeal such decision to the local board within 35
113 days of the date of the decision.
114 (i)(1) A complainant may appeal a decision of a local board that is rendered under
115 subsection (h) of this Code section in accordance with the procedures specified in Code
116 Section 20-2-1160. If the State Board of Education determines that a local school system
117 has failed to comply with this Code section, then the state board shall provide the local
118 school system with opportunities to prepare a corrective plan. If the state board
119 determines that a corrective plan of the local school system adequately plans and provides
120 for future compliance with this Code section, then the state board shall approve the plan
121 and direct the local school system to implement such plan.
122 (2) If, upon a complaint filed pursuant to subsection (h) of this Code section after one
123 year following the date of a state board order directing implementation of a corrective
H. B. 221
- 5 -

25 LC 49 2175
124 plan pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection but within four years of the date of such
125 order, the state board determines that the local school system which was subject to such
126 order has willfully failed to comply with this Code section, the state board may, after
127 consideration of the local school system's efforts to implement the corrective plan
128 approved in the earlier proceeding and of any other corrective plan that may be submitted
129 by the local school system, transmit a certification of such determination to the
130 Department of Community Affairs. If the state board's determination of noncompliance
131 is later reversed or vacated upon appeal, the state board shall immediately notify the
132 Department of Community Affairs of such action.
133 (3) If, upon a complaint filed pursuant to subsection (h) of this Code section after one
134 year following the date of a state board certification to the Department of Community
135 Affairs pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection but within four years of the date of
136 such order, the state board determines that the local school system which was subject to
137 such order has willfully failed to comply with this Code section, the state board may,
138 after consideration of the local school system's efforts to implement a corrective plan
139 approved in an earlier proceeding and of any other corrective plan that may be submitted
140 by the local school system, order that a team or teams within the local school system or
141 school within the local school system shall not participate in interscholastic postseason
142 athletic contests and that participation in violation of such an order may result in
143 withholding of state funds allotted pursuant to Code Section 20-2-186. An order of the
144 state board barring participation in interscholastic postseason athletic contests shall be
145 made and announced before the beginning of a school year.
146 (4) If, upon a complaint filed pursuant to subsection (h) of this Code section after one
147 year following the date of a state board order prohibiting participation in interscholastic
148 postseason athletic contests pursuant to paragraph (3) of this subsection but within four
149 years of the date of such order, the state board determines that the local school system
150 which was subject to such order has willfully failed to comply with this Code section, the
H. B. 221
- 6 -

25 LC 49 2175
151 state board may, after consideration of the local school system's efforts to implement a
152 corrective plan approved in an earlier proceeding and of any other corrective plan that
153 may be submitted by the local school system, withhold state funds that are allotted
154 pursuant to Code Section 20-2-186 in an amount that the state board determines is
155 sufficient to secure the local school system's compliance with this Code section. In the
156 event that state funds are withheld pursuant to this paragraph, such funds shall later be
157 allotted to the local school system at such time as the state board determines that the local
158 school system is in compliance with this Code section.
159 (j) The Department of Education may shall publish an annual report of local school
160 systems to include information regarding expenditures and participation rates for each
161 gender and such other information as the state board and department deem relevant.
162 (k)(1) In addition to any other rights or remedies otherwise provided by law, any student:
163 (A) Who is deprived of an athletic opportunity or suffers any direct or indirect harm
164 as a result of a violation of this Code section shall have a private right of action to
165 enforce the provisions of this Code section through injunctive or declaratory relief in
166 the superior court of the county in which the relevant covered entity or competition is
167 located. If an aggrieved student or such student's parent or guardian is the prevailing
168 party in such action, such student or such student's parent or guardian shall be entitled
169 to an award of reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, and expenses of litigation, but
170 shall not be entitled to any monetary damages; or
171 (B) Who is subject to retaliation or other adverse action by a covered entity or a local,
172 state, regional, or national athletic conference or association as a result of reporting a
173 violation of this Code section to an employee or representative such covered entity,
174 athletic association or conference, or any state or federal agency with oversight over
175 covered entities in this state, shall have a private cause of action for injunctive relief,
176 damages, and any other relief available under law against the covered entity or athletic
177 association or conference. If an aggrieved student or such student's parent or guardian
H. B. 221
- 7 -

25 LC 49 2175
178 is the prevailing party in such action, such student shall be entitled to an award of
179 monetary damages, including for any psychological, emotional, or physical harm
180 suffered, reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, and expenses of litigation, and any
181 other appropriate relief.
182 (2) All civil actions brought under this subsection shall be initiated within two years after
183 the alleged harm occurred.
184 (l) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to abrogate or otherwise affect the
185 operation or application of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA),
186 Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, or the federal Americans with
187 Disabilities Act of 1990."
188 SECTION 2.
189 Said title is further amended in said part by revising subparagraph (c)(1)(E) of Code Section
190 20-2-316, relating to involvement of athletic association in high school athletics, as follows:
191 "(E) The authority and duties of the executive oversight committee shall include:
192 (i) To meet in person or remotely not less than twice each school year;
193 (ii) To meet in person or remotely upon the call of the chairperson or a majority of
194 the executive oversight committee;
195 (iii) To establish policies and procedures for the executive oversight committee;
196 (iv) To conduct any independent audit, review, or investigation the executive
197 oversight committee deems necessary, including, but not limited to, the audit, review,
198 or investigation of the classifications of participating schools and travel-related travel
199 related issues of participating schools; and
200 (v) If the athletic association determines that it is necessary and appropriate to
201 prohibit students whose gender is male from participating in athletic events that are
202 designated for students whose gender is female, then the athletic association may
H. B. 221
- 8 -

25 LC 49 2175
203 adopt a policy to that effect; provided, however, that such policy shall be applied to
204 all of the athletic association's participating public high schools; and
205 (vi) To conduct an annual evaluation of the athletic association as a whole and
206 present a report of its findings, recommendations, and conclusions to the General
207 Assembly's High School Athletics Overview Committee; and"
208 SECTION 3.
209 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 221
- 9 -